District of Columbia statutes.
47-2851.19

Amnesty period.

Notwithstanding any provision of this subchapter, any business which was not required under law to obtain a license issued in the form of an endorsement to engage in a business in the District of Columbia and which did not obtain a basic business license prior to July 1, 2003, shall not be subject to any penalty or fine for failure to obtain a basic business license.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2002(l), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 2(r), 50 DCR 6913
1981 Ed., § 47-2851.19.
D.C. Law 15-38 rewrote the section.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Master Business Registration Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-302, May 3, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 3776).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Master Business Registration Delay Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-595, January 7, 2003, 50 DCR 647).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Master Business Registration Delay Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-73, April 16, 2003, 50 DCR 3616).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Master Business Registration Second Delay Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-83, May 19, 2003, 50 DCR 4100).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(r) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).
The phrase “within 6 months of April 20, 1999,” originally read “within 6 months of the effective date of this section.”.